Washington statutes.
RCW 36.49.060

"County dog license tax fund"—Transfer of excess funds in.

On the first day of March of each year all moneys in the county dog license tax fund in excess of five hundred dollars shall be transferred and credited by the county treasurer to the current expense fund of the county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.49.060. Prior: 1929 c 198 s 8; RRS s 8304-5.]